Florida, session 2026, HB267.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of section
420.9072, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
420.9072 State Housing Initiatives Partnership Program.—
The State Housing Initiatives Partnership Program is created for
the purpose of providing funds to counties and eligible
municipalities as an incentive for the creation of local housing
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb267-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 267 2026
partnerships, to expand production of and preserve affordable
housing, to further the housing element of the local government
comprehensive plan specific to affordable housing, and to
increase housing-related employment.
(7)
(b) A county or an eligible municipality may not expend
its portion of the local housing distribution to provide ongoing
rent subsidies, except for:
1. Security and utility deposit assistance.
2. Eviction prevention not to exceed 6 months' rent.
3. Lot rental assistance for mobile home owners as defined
in s. 723.003, not to exceed 6 months' rent.
4.3. A rent subsidy program for very-low-income households
with at least one adult who is a person with special needs as
defined in s. 420.0004 or homeless as defined in s. 420.621. The
period of rental assistance may not exceed 12 months for any
eligible household.
Section 2. Paragraphs (d) through (g) of subsection (3) of
section 420.9075, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (e) through (h), respectively, paragraphs (f) through
(n) of subsection (5) are redesignated as paragraphs (e) through
(m), respectively, paragraph (c) of subsection (3) and
paragraphs (a), (c), and (e) and present paragraph (n) of
subsection (5) are amended, and new paragraphs (d) and (i) are
added to subsection (3) of that section, to read:
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb267-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 267 2026
420.9075 Local housing assistance plans; partnerships.—
(3)
(c) Each county and each eligible municipality is
encouraged to develop a strategy within its local housing
assistance plan that addresses the needs of persons who are
deprived of affordable housing due to the closure of a mobile
home park or the conversion of affordable rental units to
condominiums.
(d) Each county and each eligible municipality shall
include in its local housing assistance plan a strategy that
addresses the needs of persons who are deprived of affordable
housing due to the closure of a mobile home park.
(i) Each county and each eligible municipality shall
include in its local housing assistance plan a strategy for
providing program funds to mobile home owners, as defined in s.
723.003, which must include lot rental assistance.
(5) The following criteria apply to awards made to
eligible sponsors or eligible persons for the purpose of
providing eligible housing:
(a) At least 65 percent of the funds made available in
each county and eligible municipality from the local housing
distribution must be reserved for home ownership for eligible
persons. For purposes of this paragraph, lot rental assistance
for eligible mobile home owners as defined in s. 723.003 is an
approved home ownership activity.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb267-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 267 2026
(c) At least 75 percent of the funds made available in
each county and eligible municipality from the local housing
distribution must be reserved for construction, rehabilitation,
or emergency repair of affordable, eligible housing. Funds may
be provided to mobile home owners as defined in s. 723.003 for
rehabilitation and emergency repairs under this paragraph.
(e) Not more than 20 percent of the funds made available
in each county and eligible municipality from the local housing
distribution may be used for manufactured housing.
(m)(n) Funds from the local housing distribution not used
to meet the criteria established in paragraph (a) or paragraph
(c) or not used for the administration of a local housing
assistance plan must be used for housing production and finance
activities, including, but not limited to, financing
preconstruction activities or the purchase of existing units,
providing rental housing, and providing home ownership training
to prospective home buyers and owners of homes assisted through
the local housing assistance plan.
1. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and
(c), program income as defined in s. 420.9071(26) may also be
used to fund activities described in this paragraph.
2. When preconstruction due-diligence activities conducted
as part of a preservation strategy show that preservation of the
units is not feasible and will not result in the production of
100 an eligible unit, such costs shall be deemed a program expense
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb267-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 267 2026
101 rather than an administrative expense if such program expenses
102 do not exceed 3 percent of the annual local housing
103 distribution.
104 3. If both an award under the local housing assistance
105 plan and federal low-income housing tax credits are used to
106 assist a project and there is a conflict between the criteria
107 prescribed in this subsection and the requirements of s. 42 of
108 the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the county or
109 eligible municipality may resolve the conflict by giving
110 precedence to the requirements of s. 42 of the Internal Revenue
111 Code of 1986, as amended, in lieu of following the criteria
112 prescribed in this subsection with the exception of paragraphs
113 (a) and (f) (g) of this subsection.
114 4. Each county and each eligible municipality may award
115 funds as a grant for construction, rehabilitation, or repair as
116 part of disaster recovery or emergency repairs or to remedy
117 accessibility or health and safety deficiencies. Any other
118 grants must be approved as part of the local housing assistance
119 plan.
120 Section 3. Subsection (27) of section 420.9071, Florida
121 Statutes, is amended to read:
122 420.9071 Definitions.—As used in ss. 420.907-420.9079, the
123 term:
124 (27) "Recaptured funds" means funds that are recouped by a
125 county or eligible municipality in accordance with the recapture
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb267-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 267 2026
126 provisions of its local housing assistance plan pursuant to s.
127 420.9075(5)(i) s. 420.9075(5)(j) from eligible persons or
128 eligible sponsors, which funds were not used for assistance to
129 an eligible household for an eligible activity, when there is a
130 default on the terms of a grant award or loan award.
131 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb267-00